Utah statutes.
53A-12-207.   Disposal of textbooks.
(1)  For a school year beginning with or after the 2012-13 school year, a
local school district may not dispose of textbooks used in its public schools
without first notifying all other school districts in the state of its intent
to dispose of the textbooks.
(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply to textbooks that have been damaged,
mutilated, or worn out.
(3)  The State Board of Education shall develop rules and procedures directing
the disposal of textbooks.
